tables/it-it-comp6.utb
# Uppercase letters
base uppercase \x00C3 \x00E3 # a tilde
base uppercase \x00C5 \x00e5 # latin capital letter a with ring above (unofficial)
base uppercase \x00c0 \x00e0 # a accent grave (Àà)
base uppercase \x00c1 \x00e1 # a con accento acuto (Áá)
base uppercase \x00c2 \x00e2 # a accent circonflexe (Ââ)
base uppercase \x00c4 \x00e4 # a con dieresi (Ää)
base uppercase \x00c6 \x00E6 # a e-dans-l’a (Ææ)
base uppercase \x00c7 \x00e7 # c con cediglia (Çç)
base uppercase \x00c8 \x00e8 # e con accento grave (Èè)
base uppercase \x00c9 \x00e9 # e con accento acuto (Éé)
base uppercase \x00ca \x00ea # e con accento circonflesso (Êê)
base uppercase \x00cb \x00eb # e con dieresi (Ëë)
base uppercase \x00cc \x00ec # i con accento grave (Ìì)
base uppercase \x00cd \x00ed # i con accento acuto (Íí)
base uppercase \x00ce \x00ee # i con accento circonflesso (Îî)
base uppercase \x00cf \x00ef # i con dieresi (Ïï)
base uppercase \x00d1 \x00f1 # n con tilde (Ññ)
base uppercase \x00d2 \x00f2 # o con accento grave (Òò)
base uppercase \x00d3 \x00f3 # o con accento acuto (Óó)
base uppercase \x00d4 \x00f4 # o con accento circonflesso (Ôô)
base uppercase \x00d6 \x00f6 # o con dieresi (Öö)
base uppercase \x00d8 \x00f8 # o barrata (non ufficiale)
base uppercase \x00d9 \x00f9 # u con accento grave (Ùù)
base uppercase \x00da \x00fa # u con accento acuto (Úú)
base uppercase \x00db \x00fb # u con accento circonflesso (Ûû)
base uppercase \x00dc \x00fc # u con dieresi (Üü)
base uppercase \x0152 \x0153 # oe legate (Œœ)
base uppercase \x0391 \x03b1 Α,α alfa
base uppercase \x0392 \x03b2 Β,β bêta
base uppercase \x0393 \x03b3 Γ,γ gamma
base uppercase \x0394 \x03b4 Δ,δ delta
base uppercase \x0395 \x03B5 Ε,ε epsilon
base uppercase \x0396 \x03B6 Ζ,ζ zêta
base uppercase \x0397 \x03B7 Η,η êta
base uppercase \x0398 \x03B8 Θ,θ thêta
base uppercase \x0399 \x03B9 Ι,ι iota
base uppercase \x039A \x03BA Κ,κ kappa
base uppercase \x039B \x03BB Λ,λ lambda
base uppercase \x039C \x03BC Μ,μ mu
base uppercase \x039D \x03BD Ν,ν nu
base uppercase \x039E \x03BE Ξ,ξ ksi/xi
base uppercase \x039F \x03BF Ο,ο omicron
base uppercase \x03A0 \x03C0 Π,π pi
base uppercase \x03A1 \x03C1 Ρ,ρ rhô
base uppercase \x03A3 \x03C3 Σ,σ sigma
base uppercase \x03A4 \x03C4 Τ,τ tau
base uppercase \x03A5 \x03C5 Υ,υ upsilon
base uppercase \x03A6 \x03C6 Φ,φ phi
base uppercase \x03A7 \x03C7 Χ,χ khi
base uppercase \x03A8 \x03C8 Ψ,ψ psi
base uppercase \x03A9 \x03C9 Ω,ω oméga

# Uppercase letters in computer braille mode
comp6 \x0391 46-45-1
comp6 \x0392 46-45-12
comp6 \x0393 46-45-1245
comp6 \x0394 46-45-145
comp6 \x0395 46-45-15
comp6 \x0396 46-45-1356
comp6 \x0397 46-45-125
comp6 \x0398 46-45-245
comp6 \x0399 46-45-24
comp6 \x039A 46-45-13
comp6 \x039B 46-45-123
comp6 \x039C 46-45-134
comp6 \x039D 46-45-1345
comp6 \x039E 46-45-1346
comp6 \x039F 46-45-135
comp6 \x03A0 46-45-1234
comp6 \x03A1 46-45-1235
comp6 \x03A3 46-45-234
comp6 \x03A4 46-45-2345
comp6 \x03A5 46-45-136
comp6 \x03A6 46-45-124
comp6 \x03A7 46-45-12345
comp6 \x03A8 46-45-13456
comp6 \x03A9 46-45-2456

# other signs
#include fr-bfu-comp68.cti

# with a few exceptions...
noback math \x00B1 235-36 ± più o meno
noback math \x00D7 35 × moltiplicato per
noback math \x2715 35 ✕ moltiplicato per
noback math \x00B7 35-35 · punto di moltiplicazione ; prodotto scalare
noback math \x00F7 25 ÷ diviso per

# Braille indicators
numsign 3456             # number sign, just a dots operand
numericmodechars ^,:.+-*/()=[]
numericnocontchars 0123456789

# Capitalization
capsletter 46
begcapsword 46-46
endcapsword 6-3 # The first method is not compatible with liblouis, so use of the alternative method (official but less common)
capsmodechars -'./

# Capital 'phrase' possible but lot of issues with single letters: https://github.com/liblouis/liblouis/issues/706
# begcapsphrase 25-46
# endcapsphrase before 46
# lencapsphrase 4

# Emphasis
emphclass italic
emphclass underline
emphclass bold
begemphword italic 456
begemphword underline 456
begemphword bold 456
endemphword italic 6-3
endemphword underline 6-3
endemphword bold 6-3
begemphphrase italic 25-456
endemphphrase italic before 456
lenemphphrase italic 4
begemphphrase underline 25-456
endemphphrase underline before 456
lenemphphrase underline 4
begemphphrase bold 25-456
endemphphrase bold before 456
lenemphphrase bold 4
noemphchars italic ,\s
noemphchars underline ,\s
noemphchars bold ,\s

# WIP
# Remove space from punctuation
# noback correct "\x00A0»" "»"
# noback correct "«\x00A0" "«"
# noback correct "\s;" ";"
# noback correct "\s:" ":"
# noback correct "\s?" "?"
# noback correct "\s!" "!"

noback midword \x2019 3     # right single quotation mark
midnum \s 0						# espace entre les chiffres
midnum - 36
midnum + 235
endnum + 235
midnum = 2356
endnum = 2356
midnum / 34
endnum / 34
decpoint , 2

math ] 23456
math [ 12356
midnum [ 12356
endnum [ 12356
midnum ] 23456
endnum ] 23456
midnum ( 236
endnum ( 236
midnum ) 356
endnum ) 356

postpunc , 2
postpunc ; 23
postpunc : 25
postpunc . 256
postpunc ? 26
postpunc ! 235
prepunc ( 26      # aperta tonda
postpunc ( 35      # chiusa tonda

noback always ) 35     # chiusa tonda
noback always ( 26    # aperta tonda

prepunc [ 5-12356  # crochet droit ouvrant
postpunc ] 5-23456	#	chiusa quadra
prepunc { 5-12346	#	accolade de gauche
postpunc } 5-13456	#	accolade de droite


repeated ... 256-256-256		#	points de suspension
repeated --- 36-36-36
repeated ___ 456-456-456

word = 6-2356
word + 6-235
begword + 6-235
begword = 6-2356
midword + 6-235
midword = 6-2356
endword + 6-235
endword = 6-2356

word æchmea 345-14-125-134-15-1
word ægithale 345-1245-24-2345-125-1-123-15
word ægocère 345-1245-135-14-2346-1235-15
word ægopodium 345-1245-135-1234-135-145-24-136-134
word ægosome 345-1245-135-234-135-134-15
word ælie 345-123-24-15
word ænigmatite 345-1345-24-1245-134-1-2345-24-2345-15
word æolidia 345-135-123-24-145-24-1
word æolis 345-135-123-24-234
word æschne 345-234-14-125-1345-15
word æthuse 345-2345-125-136-234-15
word althæa 1-123-2345-125-345-1
word anabæna 1-1345-1-12-345-1345-1
word angræcum 1-1345-1245-1235-345-14-136-134
word archæocète 1-1235-14-125-345-135-14-2346-2345-15
word balæniceps 12-1-123-345-1345-24-14-15-1234-234
word cæcal 14-345-14-1-123
word cæcale 14-345-14-1-123-15
word cæcaux 14-345-14-1-136-1346
word cæcilius 14-345-14-24-123-24-136-234
word cæcotrophie 14-345-14-135-2345-1235-135-1234-125-24-15
word cæcum 14-345-14-136-134
word cælostat 14-345-123-135-234-2345-1-2345
word cæsine 14-345-234-24-1345-15
word chænichthys 14-125-345-1345-24-14-125-2345-125-13456-234
word chamæcyparis 14-125-1-134-345-14-13456-1234-1-1235-24-234
word chamædorea 14-125-1-134-345-145-135-1235-15-1
word cratægus 14-1235-1-2345-345-1245-136-234
word cuphæa 14-136-1234-125-345-1
word vitæ 1236-24-2345-345
word dracæna 145-1235-1-14-345-1345-1
word élæagnacées 123456-123-345-1-1245-1345-1-14-123456-15-234
word elæagnus 15-123-345-1-1245-1345-136-234
word elæis 15-123-345-24-234
word enterobacteriaceæ 15-1345-2345-15-1235-135-12-1-14-2345-15-1235-24-1-14-15-345
word cætera 14-345-2345-15-1235-1
word æquo 345-12345-136-135
word furcræa 124-136-1235-14-1235-345-1
word grællsia 1245-1235-345-123-123-234-24-1
word lælia 123-345-123-24-1
word læliocattleya 123-345-123-24-135-14-1-2345-2345-123-15-13456-1
word lætilia 123-345-2345-24-123-24-1
word linnæa 123-24-1345-1345-345-1
word lonchæa 123-135-1345-14-125-345-1
word microsphæra 134-24-14-1235-135-234-1234-125-345-1235-1
word nævo 1345-345-1236-135
word nævus 1345-345-1236-136-234
word penæus 1234-15-1345-345-136-234
word pygære 1234-13456-1245-345-1235-15
word sphærotheca 234-1234-125-345-1235-135-2345-125-15-14-1
word suæda 234-136-345-145-1
word tæniasis 2345-345-1345-24-1-234-24-234
word tropæloacées 2345-1235-135-1234-345-123-135-1-14-123456-15-234
word Lætitia 46-123-345-2345-24-2345-24-1

word län 123-345-1345
word Länder 46-123-345-1345-145-15-1235
word ländler 123-345-1345-145-123-15-1235
word minnesänger 134-24-1345-1345-15-234-345-1345-1245-15-1235
word skärgård 234-13-345-1235-1245-5-1-1235-145
word tjäle 2345-245-345-123-15
